Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1023.
do enact as follows:SB1023,13Section 1. 36.11 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1023,2,3436.11 (3) (a) Subject to sub. subs. (3m) and (3r), the board shall establish the 5policies for admission within the system and within these policies each institution 1shall establish specific requirements for admission to its courses of instruction. No 2sectarian or partisan tests or any tests based upon race, religion, national origin of 3U.S. citizens or sex shall ever be allowed in the admission of students thereto.SB1023,24Section 2. 36.11 (3r) of the statutes is created to read:SB1023,2,8536.11 (3r) Objective criteria for admission. (a) In this subsection, 6“college entrance examination” means the ACT, as defined in s. 39.41 (9) (a) 1., the 7SAT, as defined in s. 39.41 (9) (a) 3., or a similar national or regional test for 8measuring college readiness.SB1023,2,139(b) The board shall ensure that undergraduate admission decisions at each 10institution are predominantly based on college entrance examination performance 11or similar objective testing measures. This paragraph does not apply with respect 12to applicants admitted through the guaranteed admission program under sub. 13(3m).SB1023,314Section 3. Initial applicability.SB1023,2,1615(1) This act first applies to applications for admission for the 2027-28 16academic year.SB1023,2,1717